District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.22

Additional standards for providers of severe weather shelter.

In addition to the standards in § 4-754.21, providers of severe weather shelter shall provide:

(1)

When severe weather conditions continue overnight, a clean bed with clean linens, pad, and blanket for each bed;

(2)

Basic needs, such as food and clothing and other supportive services, or information about where to obtain such basic needs and supportive services;

(3)

24-hour, properly functioning toilet facilities;

(4)

Cool water, available via water cooler, fountain, or other means; and

(5)

Properly functioning heating and cooling systems during the appropriate seasons.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 13, 52 DCR 8113
This section is referenced in § 4-754.23, § 4-754.24, and § 4-754.25.